test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_O_waabooz_gt-glossing.yaml
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaaboozmishwaabniig
     3+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: waaboozmishwaabniin
     3+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: waaboozmishwaabniing
     3+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: waaboozmishniwbaniin
     3+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: waaboozmishniwbaniing
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nwaaboozoonymishnaanbaniin
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nwaaboozoonymishnaanbaniing
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nwaaboozoonymishnaanbaniig
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nwaaboozoonsmishnaanbaniin
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nwaaboozoonsmishnaanbaniing
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nwaaboozoonsmishnaanbaniig
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gwaaboozoonymishnaanbaniin
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaaboozoonymishnaanbaniing
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaaboozoonymishnaanbaniig
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gwaaboozoonymishwaabniin
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaaboozoonymishwaabniing
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaaboozoonymishwaabniig
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gwaaboozoonsmishnaanbaniin
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaaboozoonsmishnaanbaniing
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaaboozoonsmishnaanbaniig
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gwaaboozoonsmishwaabniin
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaaboozoonsmishwaabniing
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaaboozoonsmishwaabniig
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: waaboozoonymishwaabniin
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: waaboozoonymishwaabniing
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: waaboozoonymishniwbaniin
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: waaboozoonymishniwbaniing
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: waaboozoonsmishwaabniin
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: waaboozoonsmishwaabniing
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: waaboozoonsmishniwbaniin
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: waaboozoonsmishniwbaniing
     
